Maine, session 132, LD905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §1, is
further amended to read:
8. Unused kilowatt-hour credits; rules. To the extent rules adopted under this
section provide for the periodic expiration of unused kilowatt-hour credits accumulated by
a customer participating in a net energy billing arrangement, the commission shall require
by rule that each transmission and distribution utility with a net energy billing arrangement
shall account for and, on or before January April 1st of each year, remit the value of all
unused kilowatt-hour credits that were accumulated and that expired during the prior
calendar year to the commission administrators of the statewide low-income assistance plan
and the individual low-income assistance programs as designated by the commission by
rules adopted pursuant to section 3214, subsection 2 for the benefit of individuals receiving
low‑income assistance in accordance with section 3214, subsection 2 those rules. The rules
adopted by the commission pursuant to this subsection must:
A. Establish the manner by which a transmission and distribution utility must account
for unused kilowatt-hour credits that were accumulated by all customers of the utility
with net energy billing arrangements during the prior calendar year and that expired
during the prior calendar year; and
B. Establish the manner by which a transmission and distribution utility must remit
the value of the unused and expired kilowatt‑hour credits.;and
C. Identify the manner by which the transmission and distribution utility must report
to the commission information regarding the number of unused kilowatt-hour credits
that were accumulated by all customers of the utility with net energy billing
arrangements during the prior calendar year and that expired during the prior calendar
year and the monetary value of those credits.
Page 1 - 132LR0554(03)

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, rules adopted by the
commission pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 2 - 132LR0554(03)